Alabama, session 2026rs, HB414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 9-11-72 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§9-11-72
(a) A violation of any rule of the Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources prohibiting the
transportation and release of live feral swine shall be a
Class B misdemeanor punishable as provided by law, except the
defendant shall be subject to a mandatory minimum fine of not
less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
department may not prohibit the transportation of live feral
swine, and the transportation of live feral swine shall not be
a criminal offense."
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2